tables/hu-exceptionwords.cti
#This file containing exception words with different need appliing general hungarian combined braille letters, for example cs, ccs, ty, tty rules
#cs, ccs related exceptions
noback pass2 @36-146-346-146-6 @36-146-346-146
partword arccs 1-1235-14-146	For example arccsont, harccsoport, harccselekmény words
partword arcsérül =	For example arcsérülés word
partword habarccs 125-1-12-1-1235-146-146	For example habarccsal word
begword harcso =	For example harcsor word
partword árbóc =	For example árbóccsúcs word
partword árboc =	For example árboccsúcs word
begword fegyenc 124-15-1456-15-1345-14	For example fegyenccsoport, fegyencsapkát words
begword filc =	For example filccsizma word
partword gerinc =	For example gerincsérült, gerincsérv words
partword kilenc =	For example kilenccsatorna word
partword kavics 13-1-1236-24-146	For example kavicszápor, kavicszátony, kavicszuzalék, kavicsszerű words
partword kaviccs 13-1-1236-24-146-146	For example kaviccsá word, only backtranslation affected this exception, normal contracted braille text are Ok
begword kudarc =	For example kudarcsorozat
begword különcsé =	For example különcség word
begword lánc =	For example láncszem, lánccsörgés words
partword licenc =	For example licencsértés, licenccsalád words
partword malac =	For example malacság, malacsült words
begword nerc =	For example nercstóla word
always nercsinszk 1345-15-1235-146-24-1345-156-13
always pácsó =	Pácsó word
partword polc =	For example polcsor word
begword ipolcs 24-1234-135-123-146
partword tapolcsá 2345-1-1234-135-123-146-4
begword opolcs 135-1234-135-123-146
partword porcsé =	For example porcsérülés word
begword szocsegé 156-135-14-234-15-1245-16	For example szocsegély word
always orangutáncs 135-1235-1-1345-1245-136-2345-4-1345-146	For example orangutáncsalád word
begword kóccs 13-246-14-146	For example kóccsomó word
partword tánc =	For example tánccsoport word
partword sátáncsap 234-4-2345-4-1345-146-1-1234	For example sátáncsapat word
partword piac =	For example piaccsarnok word
partword piacsök 1234-24-1-146-12345-13	For example Entrópiacsökkentés word
always piacson 1234-24-1-146-135-1345
partword szanitéccs 156-1-1345-24-2345-16-14-146	For example szanitéccsoport word
partword pokróc =	For example pokróccsík word
partword cször 146-126-12345-1235	For example kulcszörgés, bilincszörgés, kilincszörgést words
partword kartács 13-1-1235-2345-4-146	For example kartácszápor word
partword papucsz 1234-1-1234-136-146-126	For example papucszápor word
always ínyencsé 34-1246-15-1345-14-234-16	For example ínyencség word
begword bohóc =	For example bohócsapkája word
partword kalapácszen 13-1-123-1-1234-4-146-126-15-1345	For example kalapácszengés word
begword ákác =	For example ákácsövény word
begword akác =	For example akácsövény word
begword viccso =	For example viccsor word need this exception
begword ércsis =	For example ércsisak word
always ércsas =	For example ércsas word
begword virgonc =	For example virgoncság word need this exception
begword martalóc =
partword újonc =	For example újoncság word
begword kuruc =	For example kurucság word
word kurucsó 13-136-1235-136-146-246	For example Kurucsó is a family name, not need applying this situation the prewious defined general exception. Always opcode too risk this rule
begword kurucsó 13-136-1235-136-146-246	For example Kurucsó is a family name, not need applying this situation the prewious defined kuruc word part related general exception. Always opcode too risk this rule, this begword rule handling suffixes after Kurucsó family name
begword palóc =	For example palócság word
begword fejléc =
begword nyolc 1246-135-123-14	For example nyolcsebességes, nyolccsatornás words
begword bércsüve =	For example bércsüveg word
begword elméncsé =	For example elméncség word
begword ércsala =	For example ércsalak word
partword érccs 16-1235-14-146	For example érccsapadék, érccsengés, érccsatorna words
begword ércsely 16-1235-14-234-15-456	For example ércselyem word
begword ércsí =	For example ércsíp, ércsípjába, ércsípláda words
partword ércsípte 16-1235-146-34-1234-2345-15	For example ércsíptető word an exception
begword ércsodr =	For example ércsodrony word
begword garabonc =	For example garaboncsereg word
begword labanc =
begword kéjenc 13-16-245-15-1345-14
partword jegeccsop 245-15-1245-15-14-146-135-1234	For example jegeccsoport word
partword lazac 123-1-126-1-14	For example lazaccsontváz word
partword vakarccs 1236-1-13-1-1235-146-146	For example vakarccsal word
always arcseb =	For example arcseb, arcsebe words
partword nyargonccs 1246-1-1235-1245-135-1345-14-146	For example nyargonccsizma word
always piperecso 1234-24-1234-15-1235-15-146-135	For example piperecsomag word
partword perec =	For example perecsütőnő, vállpereccsontjából words
always perecse 1234-15-1235-15-146-15
always perecsé 1234-15-1235-15-146-16
always perecske 1234-15-1235-15-146-13-15
begword princség =	For example princséged word
always rácság =	For example rácság, rácságból words
partword suhanc =	For example suhanccsürhe, suhancsereg word
partword udvaronc =	For example udvaroncsereg word need this exception
partword harminc =	For example harmincsornyi word
always kapolcs 13-1-1234-135-123-146	Kapolcs is a town name, need this general exception
always kapolccs 13-1-1234-135-123-146-146	For example Kapolccsal town name suffix related need this general exception
word polcs 1234-135-123-146	need this exception to hyphenated Kapolcs town name last part presenting right the braille display
partword matrac =	For example matracsor word
partword barkács 12-1-1235-13-4-146	For example barkácszene word
begword barccsa 12-1-1235-146-146-1	For example Barccsal word
partword kalapácszon 13-1-123-1-1234-4-146-126-135-1345	For example kalapácszongora word related need this exception
begword láncsá 123-4-1345-146-4	An old hungarian word related need this exception. This word used for example Mihály Fazekas with the Lúdas Matyi book
partword láncsor =	For example karakterláncsor word related need this exception
partword oroszláncsor 135-1235-135-156-123-4-1345-146-135-1235	For example oroszláncsorda, oroszláncsordát words related not need applying the prewious defined exception
partword ketrec =	For example ketreccsapda, ketrecsor words related need this general exception
begword ércsar 16-1235-14-234-1-1235	For example ércsarukkal word
partword titáncs 2345-24-2345-4-1345-146	For example titáncsoport, titáncső words related need this exception
begword tornác =	For example tornácsor word related need this general exception
partword karcsoroz 13-1-1235-14-234-135-1235-135-126	For example rézkarcsorozat, rézkarcsorozatokat words related need this general exception
partword ujjperc =	For example ujjperccsont, ujjperccsontok words related need this general exception
begword daróc =	For example daróccsuháját, daróccsuha words related need this general exception
partword kapoccsal 13-1-1234-135-146-146-1-123
word kapoccsal 13-1-1234-135-146-146-1-123
partword kapoccsá 13-1-1234-135-146-146-4
word kapoccsá 13-1-1234-135-146-146-4
partword kapocs 13-1-1234-135-146	For example kapocszár word
partword ifjonc =	For example ifjonccsapat word
partword párduc =	For example párduccsík word
partword ribanc =	For example ribanccsizma word
partword homotópia =	For example homotópiacsoport word
partword olimpia =	For example olimpiacsapat word
always piacsek 1234-24-1-146-15-13
partword szendvicszab 156-15-1345-145-1236-24-146-126-1-12	For example szendvicszabáló word
begword hecc =	For example heccsajtójának word
partword tanonc =	For example tanonccsaj word related need this exception
partword kulcszen 13-136-123-146-126-15-1345	For example kulcszenekara word
partword zománc 126-135-134-4-1345-14	For example zománcsérülés, tűzzománcsorozat words
partword léccs 123-16-14-146	For example díszléccsíkot word related need this general exception
partword meccszá 134-15-146-146-126-4	For example meccszáró word related need this general exception
partword csúcszen 146-346-146-126-15-1345	For example csúcszenekarának word related need this exception
partword narancs 1345-1-1235-1-1345-146	For example narancszombi word related need this general exception
partword platán =	For example platáncsoport, platáncsere word need this general exception
always csokilencs 146-135-13-24-123-15-1345-146	For example csokilencse, csokilencsét words
always polcsalás 1234-135-123-146-1-123-4-234	For example szocpolcsalás word
always harcstíl 125-1-1235-14-234-2345-34-123	For example harcstílus word
always metáncs 134-15-2345-4-1345-146	For example metáncsökkentéssel word
always arcsej 1-1235-14-234-15-245	For example arcsebész, arcsejtekkel word
always lánccsopo 123-4-1345-14-146-135-1234-135	For example lánccsoport word
always bíbiccs 12-34-12-24-14-146	For example bíbiccsapat word
always lánccser 123-4-1345-14-146-15-1235	For example lánccsere word
always bérencsé 12-16-1235-15-1345-14-234-16	For example bérencséggel word
always arcsmink 1-1235-14-234-134-24-1345-13	For example arcsminkünk word
always lánccsom 123-4-1345-14-146-135-134	For example lánccsomag word
always porcsej 1234-135-1235-14-234-15-245	For example fülporcsejt, porcsejtjeit words
always percskál 1234-15-1235-14-234-13-4-123	For example percskáláján word
always boncseg 12-135-1345-14-234-15-1245	For example boncsegédet word
always láncstr 123-4-1345-14-234-2345-1235	For example blokláncstruktúrából, láncstruktúra words
always piacsemp 1234-24-1-146-15-134-1234	For example piacsempészésen word
always perccsász 1234-15-1235-14-146-4-156	For example perccsászárok word
always arcsimo 1-1235-14-234-24-134-135	For example arcsimogató word
always arcsimí 1-1235-14-234-24-134-34	For example arcsimító word
always arcstru 1-1235-14-234-2345-1235-136	For example arcstruktúra word
always arcsál 1-1235-14-234-4-123	For example arcsál word
always élcsor 16-123-14-234-135-1235	For example élcsor word
always perccse 1234-15-1235-14-146-15	For example perccsepp word
always hóláncspra 125-246-123-4-1345-14-234-1234-1235-1	For example hóláncspray word
always kedvencsé 13-15-145-1236-15-1345-14-234-16	For example kedvencség word
always orbánccs 135-1235-12-4-1345-14-146	For example orbánccsalád word
always arcstí 1-1235-14-234-2345-34	For example arcstílusok word
always porccs 1234-135-1235-14-146	For example porccserje, porccsontja word
always kredencsz 13-1235-15-145-15-1345-14-156	For example kredencszindrómának word
always kredencs 13-1235-15-145-15-14-234	For example kredencsarok word
always tengeliccs 2345-15-1345-1245-15-123-24-14-146	For example tengeliccsapatból word
begword arcsa 1-1235-14-234-1	For example arcsav word
always arcsép 1-1235-14-234-4-1234	For example arcsápadtsággal word
always ránccs 1235-4-1345-14-146	For example ránccsökkentő word
always lécst 123-16-14-234-2345	For example lécstruktúra word
always románcso 1235-135-134-4-1345-14-234-135	For example románcsorozata word
always percstíl 1234-15-1235-14-234-2345-34-123	For example percstílus word
always percstop 1234-15-1235-14-234-2345-135-1234	For example percstoppos word
always dúcsüve 145-346-14-234-12356-1236-15	For example dúcsüveg word
always ércsípő 16-1235-146-34-1234-12456	For example ércsípő word
always láncspec 123-4-1345-14-234-1234-15-14    For example blokkláncspecifikus word
